Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.086

Certificate of ascertainment.

In submitting this state's certificate of ascertainment as required by 3 U.S.C. Sec. 6, the governor shall certify this state's electors and state in the certificate that:

(1) The electors will serve as electors unless a vacancy occurs in the office of elector before the end of the meeting at which elector votes are cast, in which case a substitute elector will fill the vacancy; and

(2) If a substitute elector is appointed to fill a vacancy, the governor will submit an amended certificate of ascertainment stating the names on the final list of this state's electors.

[ 2019 c 143 s 5.]

NOTES:

Short title—Uniformity of application and construction—2019 c 143: See notes following RCW 29A.56.080.